Illinois, session 104th, SB2062.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 527A-9 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27A-9)7    Sec. 27A-9. Term of charter; renewal. 8    (a) An initial charter shall be granted for a period of 5 9school years. A charter may be renewed in incremental periods 10not to exceed 10 school years. Authorizers shall ensure that 11every charter granted on or after January 1, 2017 includes 12standards and goals for academic, organizational, and 13financial performance. A charter must meet all standards and 14goals for academic, organizational, and financial performance 15set forth by the authorizer in order to be renewed for a term 16in excess of 5 years but not more than 10 years. If an 17authorizer fails to establish standards and goals, a charter 18shall not be renewed for a term in excess of 5 years. Nothing 19contained in this Section shall require an authorizer to grant 20a full 10-year renewal term to any particular charter school, 21but an authorizer may award a full 10-year renewal term to 22charter schools that have a demonstrated track record of 23improving student performance.   SB2062- 2 -LRB104 03586 LNS 13610 b1    (b) A charter school renewal proposal submitted to the 2local school board or the State Board, as the chartering 3entity, shall contain:4        (1) a report on the progress of the charter school in 5    achieving the goals, objectives, pupil performance 6    standards, content standards, and other terms of the 7    initial approved charter proposal; and8        (2) a financial statement that discloses the costs of 9    administration, instruction, and other spending categories 10    for the charter school that is understandable to the 11    general public and that will allow comparison of those 12    costs to other schools or other comparable organizations, 13    in a format required by the State Board.14    A charter school authorized by the State Board must 15provide a copy of its charter renewal proposal to the local 16school board or boards of the resident district or districts 17at the same time that it submits its proposal to the State 18Board. The local school board of each resident district shall 19have an opportunity to negotiate with the charter school for a 20transfer of authorization prior to the State Board voting on 21the renewal proposal. Authorization shall be transferred from 22the State Board to a local school board at the end of the 23charter term with the agreement of both the charter school and 24the local school board. The State Board may adopt any rules 25necessary to implement the changes made by this amendatory Act 26of the 104th General Assembly.   SB2062- 3 -LRB104 03586 LNS 13610 b1    (c) A charter may be revoked or not renewed if the local 2school board or the State Board, as the chartering entity, 3clearly demonstrates that the charter school did any of the 4following, or otherwise failed to comply with the requirements 5of this law:6        (1) Committed a material violation of any of the 7    conditions, standards, or procedures set forth in the 8    charter.9        (2) Failed to meet or make reasonable progress toward 10    achievement of the content standards or pupil performance 11    standards identified in the charter.12        (3) Failed to meet generally accepted standards of 13    fiscal management.14        (4) Violated any provision of law from which the 15    charter school was not exempted.16    In the case of revocation, the local school board or the 17State Board, as the chartering entity, shall notify the 18charter school in writing of the reason why the charter is 19subject to revocation. The charter school shall submit a 20written plan to the local school board or the State Board, 21whichever is applicable, to rectify the problem. The plan 22shall include a timeline for implementation, which shall not 23exceed 2 years or the date of the charter's expiration, 24whichever is earlier. If the local school board or the State 25Board, as the chartering entity, finds that the charter school 26has failed to implement the plan of remediation and adhere to   SB2062- 4 -LRB104 03586 LNS 13610 b1the timeline, then the chartering entity shall revoke the 2charter. Except in situations of an emergency where the 3health, safety, or education of the charter school's students 4is at risk, the revocation shall take place at the end of a 5school year. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 6prohibit an implementation timetable that is less than 2 years 7in duration. No local school board may arbitrarily or 8capriciously revoke or not renew a charter. Except for 9extenuating circumstances outlined in this Section, if a local 10school board revokes or does not renew a charter, it must 11ensure that all students currently enrolled in the charter 12school are placed in schools that are higher performing than 13that charter school, as defined in the State's federal Every 14Student Succeeds Act accountability plan. In determining 15whether extenuating circumstances exist, a local school board 16must detail, by clear and convincing evidence, that factors 17unrelated to the charter school's accountability designation 18outweigh the charter school's academic performance. 19    (d) (Blank).20    (e) Notice of a local school board's decision to deny, 21revoke, or not renew a charter shall be provided to the State 22Board. 23    The State Board may reverse a local board's decision to 24revoke or not renew a charter if the State Board finds that the 25charter school or charter school proposal (i) is in compliance 26with this Article and (ii) is in the best interests of the   SB2062- 5 -LRB104 03586 LNS 13610 b1students it is designed to serve. The State Board may 2condition the granting of an appeal on the acceptance by the 3charter school of funding in an amount less than that 4requested in the proposal submitted to the local school board. 5The State Board must appoint and utilize a hearing officer for 6any appeals conducted under this subsection. Final decisions 7of the State Board are subject to judicial review under the 8Administrative Review Law. 9    (f) Notwithstanding other provisions of this Article, if 10the State Board on appeal reverses a local board's decision or 11if a charter school is approved by referendum, the State Board 12shall act as the authorized chartering entity for the charter 13school and shall perform all functions under this Article 14otherwise performed by the local school board. The State Board 15shall report the aggregate number of charter school pupils 16resident in a school district to that district and shall 17notify the district of the amount of funding to be paid by the 18State Board to the charter school enrolling such students. The 19charter school shall maintain accurate records of daily 20attendance and student enrollment and shall enter data on the 21students served, their characteristics, their particular 22needs, the programs in which they participate, and their 23academic achievement into the statewide student information 24system established by the State Board. The State Board shall 25withhold from funds otherwise due the district the funds 26authorized by this Article to be paid to the charter school and   SB2062- 6 -LRB104 03586 LNS 13610 b1shall pay such amounts to the charter school in quarterly 2installments, calculated as follows:3        (1) The amount of the first quarterly payment shall be 4    based on the projected number of students who will be 5    enrolled in the charter school in the upcoming school 6    year, multiplied by one-fourth of the resident district's 7    per capita tuition amount. Each charter school shall 8    submit its projected enrollment by no later than August 1 9    of each year on a form provided by the State Board for this 10    purpose.11        (2) The amount of the second quarterly payment shall 12    be calculated such that the aggregate amount of the first 13    and second quarterly installments is equal to the number 14    of students reported as enrolled at the charter school on 15    October 1 in the State Board's student information system, 16    multiplied by one-half of the resident district's per 17    capita tuition amount.18        (3) The amount of the third quarterly payment shall be 19    based on the number of students enrolled in the charter 20    school on January 1, multiplied by one-fourth of the 21    resident district's per capita tuition amount. Each 22    charter school shall submit its January 1 enrollment by no 23    later than January 5 of each year on a form provided by the 24    State Board for this purpose. 25        (4) The amount of the fourth quarterly payment shall 26    be calculated such that the aggregate amount of the third   SB2062- 7 -LRB104 03586 LNS 13610 b1    and fourth installments is equal to the number of students 2    reported as enrolled at the charter school on March 1 in 3    the State Board's student information system, multiplied 4    by one-half of the resident district's per capita tuition 5    amount. 6    (g) (Blank).7    (h) The State Board shall pay directly to a charter school 8it authorizes any federal or State funding attributable to a 9student with a disability attending the school. 10(Source: P.A. 103-175, eff. 6-30-23.)